Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Chapter 27. Child Support Services Agency.

Cross references. —

For provision prescribing the applicability of the 2009 amendments of this chapter, see § 14, ch. 45, SLA 2009, in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For child support enforcement, see 15 AAC 125.

Legislative history reports. —

For report of the chair of the House Finance Committee on HCS SSSB 659 (Finance), from which ch. 251, SLA 1976 (HCS SSSB 659 (Rules)), which enacted this chapter, derives, see 1976 House Journal 1583.

Collateral references. —

41 Am. Jur. 2d, Illegitimate Children, §§ 90-97

59 Am. Jur. 2d, Parent and Child § 42 et seq.

14 C.J.S., Children Out of Wedlock, §§ 40 et seq., 88-93

67A Parent and Child, § 156 et seq.

Sec. 25.27.010.
Creation of child support services agency.

There is created in the Department of Revenue the child support services agency.

History.

(§ 1 ch 251 SLA 1976; am § 16 ch 126 SLA 1977; am § 1 ch 107 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.010. Renumbered in 1990.

Cross references. —

For provision designating the child support services agency created under this section as the support enforcement agency under the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, see AS

25.25.102

.

Sec. 25.27.020.
Duties and responsibilities of the agency.

The agency shall

seek enforcement of child support orders of the state in other jurisdictions and shall obtain, enforce, and administer the orders in this state;

adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of this chapter and AS 25.25, including regulations that establish

procedures for hearings conducted under AS

25.27.170

and for administrative enforcement of support orders;

subject to AS

25.27.025

and to federal law, a uniform rate of interest on arrearages of support that shall be charged the obligor upon notice if child support payments are 10 or more days overdue or if payment is made by a check backed by insufficient funds; however, an obligor may not be charged interest on late payment of a child support obligation, other than a payment on arrearages, if the obligor is

employed and income is being withheld from the obligor’s wages under an income withholding order;

receiving unemployment compensation and child support obligations are being withheld from the obligor’s unemployment payments under AS

23.20.401

; or

receiving compensation for disabilities under AS 23.30 and child support obligations are being withheld from the obligor’s compensation payments;

procedures for establishing and disestablishing paternity under AS

25.27.165

and

25.27.166

, including procedures for hearings; and

procedures under which the agency shall enter into contracts or agreements with financial institutions, including brokerage houses, insurance companies, and other companies providing individual investment, transaction, or deposit accounts, doing business in the state to develop and operate an automated data match system as required by 42 U.S.C. 666(a)(17); the agency may pay a reasonable fee to a financial institution for conducting a data match under a contract or agreement under this subparagraph; the fee may not exceed the actual costs incurred by the financial institution for conducting the data match;

administer and enforce AS 25.25 (Uniform Interstate Family Support Act);

establish, enforce, and administer child support obligations administratively under this chapter;

administer the state plan required under 42 U.S.C. 651 — 669 (Title IV-D, Social Security Act) as amended;

disburse support payments collected by the agency to the obligee, together with interest charged under (2)(B) of this subsection;

establish and enforce administratively under this chapter, or through the superior courts of the state, child support orders from other jurisdictions pertaining to obligors within the state;

enforce and administer spousal support orders if a spousal support obligation has been established with respect to the spouse and if the support obligation established with respect to the child of that spouse is also being administered;

obtain a medical support order that meets the requirements of AS

25.27.060(c)

and

25.27.063

;

act on behalf of the Department of Health and Social Services in the enforcement of AS

47.07.025(b)

;

establish or disestablish, administratively under AS

25.27.165

—

25.27.166

or through court action, the paternity of a child;

promptly provide to the Bureau of Vital Statistics, in a format approved by the bureau, any final agency decision administratively establishing or disestablishing the paternity of a child born in this state; and

act as the central registry for all child support orders and exchange information as required by federal law.

In determining the amount of money an obligor must pay to satisfy the obligor’s immediate duty of support, the agency shall consider all payments made by the obligor directly to the obligee or to the obligee’s custodian before the time the obligor is ordered to make payments through the agency. After the obligor is ordered to make payments through the agency, the agency may not consider direct payments made to the obligee or the obligee’s custodian unless the obligor provides clear and convincing evidence of the payment.

If admitted to the practice of law in the state, the director of the agency, or the director’s designee, shall sign a complaint or other pleadings on behalf of the agency in an action to establish or enforce a support obligation under this chapter in which the agency is not represented by the attorney general.

The agency may issue an administrative order or request a court order that requires an individual in arrears under an order of support for a child who is receiving assistance under AS 47.07, or under AS 47.25.310 — 47.25.420 or a successor program, or for a child whose parent, guardian, or designee of the parent or guardian has applied for aid from the agency under AS

25.27.100

, to make payments according to an approved payment plan or, if the individual is not incapacitated, to participate in appropriate work activities.

To the extent required by federal law and as necessary for locating individuals for child support purposes, the agency, the child support enforcement agency of another state, or the federal government is entitled to have access to information used by the Department of Public Safety or a successor agency to locate an individual for purposes relating to motor vehicles or law enforcement.

The agency shall, by regulation, establish procedures and standards for the forgiveness of an arrearage owed to the state under AS

25.27.120

. The agency may forgive arrears under this section, with the approval of the commissioner and without the approval of the Department of Law, if

the obligor

has or obtains employment for which income withholding is initiated under AS

25.27.250

within 60 days after the date the obligor is approved for the forgiveness program;

enrolls in and successfully completes an employment training program approved by the agency and obtains employment for which income withholding is initiated under AS

25.27.250

within 30 days after completion of the employment training program; or

enters into an agreement with the agency for alternative payment procedures if the agency determines that there are unusual circumstances justifying a waiver of income withholding;

the obligor is in compliance with additional requirements and limitations imposed by the agency by regulation to assure that forgiveness of the arrearage is in the best interest of the child and of the state; and

the obligor makes monthly payments pursuant to a payment agreement approved by the agency; if the obligor misses more than two monthly payments in a calendar year or more than two consecutive payments without approval of the agency for good cause, the obligor is not eligible to continue in the arrears forgiveness program under this section.

During each year in which an obligor complies with the requirements for the forgiveness of an arrearage under (f) of this section and any regulations adopted by the agency under that subsection, the agency may forgive up to 20 percent of the total arrearage owed to the state under AS

25.27.120

, including any interest owed on that debt. For purposes of determining the amount of the forgiveness, the arrears shall be calculated as of the date the obligor is approved for participation in the forgiveness program.

The agency may establish by regulation requirements and limitations on eligibility in addition to those stated in (f) and (g) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 251 SLA 1976; am § 17 ch 126 SLA 1977; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 118 SLA 1982; am § 4 ch 40 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 1986; am §§ 4, 5 ch 68 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 7 FSSLA 1994; am § 4 ch 102 SLA 1994; am § 7 ch 57 SLA 1995; am §§ 74 — 77 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 6 ch 106 SLA 2000; am §§ 12, 13 ch 108 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.020. Renumbered in 1990.

Cross references. —

For determination of amount of child support, see Rule 90.3, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, adopted for use by child support services agency at 15 AAC 125.010. For the successor program referred to in subsection (d), see AS 47.27; for the successor agency referred to in subsection (e), see Executive Orders 98 and 99, which transferred many functions related to motor vehicles to the Department of Administration and the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities.

Administrative Code. —

For hearing procedures, see 15 AAC 5, art. 1.

For calculation of child support awards in administrative establishment or review proceedings, see 15 AAC 125, art. 1.

For administrative establishment of child support orders, see 15 AAC 125, art. 2.

For paternity, see 15 AAC 125, art. 3.

For review and adjustment of support obligations, see 15 AAC 125, art. 4.

For administrative enforcement — income withholding, see 15 AAC 125, art. 6.

For licensing actions, see 15 AAC 125, art. 7.

For arrears forgiveness program, see 15 AAC 125, art. 8.

For administrative actions under the uniform interstate family support act, see 15 AAC 125, art. 9.

Legislative history reports. —

For House letter of intent relating to the 1985 amendment to this section, see 1985 House Journal page 740.

Sec. 25.27.022.
Establishment and enforcement requests from other states.

The agency may act, under the laws of this state, upon requests from similar state agencies in other states that operate child support enforcement programs under 42 U.S.C. 651 — 669 (Title IV-D Social Security Act) to establish or disestablish paternity and to establish and enforce against obligors within this state support obligations determined in other states.

Except for requests for assistance made under (c) of this section or AS

25.25.501

, requests from child support enforcement agencies in other states shall be made by application containing the information that this state’s agency requires and including written authorization from the requesting state agency and the obligee for this state’s agency to initiate necessary action.

Requests from a child support agency of another state for assistance in enforcing support orders through high-volume automated administrative enforcement may be made by electronic or other means and must include the information required by 42 U.S.C. 666(a)(14).

An employer receiving an income withholding order from a child support agency of another state shall comply with the choice of law provisions of AS

25.25.502(d)

,

25.25.503

, and 42 U.S.C. 666(b)(6)(A)(i)(V).

History.

(§ 5 ch 40 SLA 1985; am § 8 ch 57 SLA 1995; am §§ 21, 22 ch 132 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.022. Renumbered in 1990.

Cross references. —

For additional provisions on enforcement and establishment of child support orders in interstate cases, see AS 25.25. For purpose and findings provisions related to the 1998 amendments affecting this section, see § 1, ch. 132, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For administrative establishment of child support orders, see 15 AAC 125, art. 2.

For administrative enforcement — income withholding, see 15 AAC 125, art. 6.

Sec. 25.27.025.
Rate of interest.

The rate of interest imposed under AS

25.27.020(a)(2)(B)

shall be six percent a year or a lesser rate that is the maximum rate of interest permitted to be imposed under federal law.

History.

(§ 6 ch 118 SLA 1982; am § 6 ch 40 SLA 1985; am § 12 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 78 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.025. Renumbered in 1990.

Administrative Code. —

For administrative enforcement — income withholding, see 15 AAC 125, art. 6.

Sec. 25.27.030.
Establishment of fund.

There is established in the state general fund a continuing, revolving, reserve account to receive collections and make the authorized disbursements of the agency.

History.

(§ 1 ch 251 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.030. Renumbered in 1990.

Sec. 25.27.040.
Determination of paternity.

The agency may appear on behalf of minor children or their mother or legal custodian or the state and initiate efforts to have the paternity of children born out of wedlock determined by the court. When the agency is a party to a court action in which paternity is contested, it shall request and pay for genetic testing and procedures under AS

25.20.050(e)

and may recover the costs of the testing as provided in AS

25.20.050(f)

.

The agency may not attempt to establish paternity in any case

involving incest or forcible rape, unless the mother of the child is legally competent and requests the establishment of paternity; in this paragraph, “forcible rape” means sexual assault in the first degree under AS

11.41.410

or a conviction under a law or ordinance from another jurisdiction with similar elements; “forcible rape” includes adjudications of delinquency for acts with elements similar to AS

11.41.410

;

when legal proceedings for adoption are pending; or

when it would not be in the best interests of the children or the state.

When the agency is a party in a court action in which paternity is contested, the agency shall move for a default judgment in a case that meets the conditions specified in AS

25.20.050(g)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 251 SLA 1976; am § 18 ch 126 SLA 1977; am § 2 ch 69 SLA 1989; am § 4 ch 80 SLA 1994; am §§ 9, 10 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 13 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 79 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 14 ch 108 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.040. Renumbered in 1990.

Administrative Code. —

For paternity, see 15 AAC 125, art. 3.

Sec. 25.27.045.
Determination of support obligation.

The agency may appear in an action seeking an award of support on behalf of a child owed a duty of support, or to enforce a spousal support order if a spousal support obligation has been established and if a support obligation, established with respect to a child of that spouse, is also being administered, and may also appear in an action seeking modification of a support order, decree, or judgment already entered.
Action under this section may be undertaken upon application of an obligee, or at the agency’s own discretion if the obligor is liable to the state under AS

25.27.120(a)

or (b).

History.

(§ 19 ch 126 SLA 1977; am § 7 ch 40 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.045. Renumbered in 1990.

Administrative Code. —

For calculation of child support awards in administrative establishment or review proceedings, see 15 AAC 125, art. 1.

For review and adjustment of support obligations, see 15 AAC 125, art. 4.

Sec. 25.27.050.
Legal assistance.

The agency shall contract with the Department of Law to provide needed legal services.

History.

(§ 1 ch 251 SLA 1976; am § 20 ch 126 SLA 1977)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.050. Renumbered in 1990.

Sec. 25.27.060.
Order of support.

Unless otherwise provided under AS

25.24.910

or AS

25.27.061

, an order of support establishes a relationship by which the custodian of the child is the administrator for the purposes of administering child support on behalf of the child. The court shall carefully consider the need for support, the ability of both parents to meet such support obligations, the extent to which the parents supported the child before divorce, and the economic ability of the parents to pay after separation and divorce. The court shall also consider the effect on the support obligation of a change in custodian. The need of the child for support shall be considered regardless of the sex of the parent awarded custody of the child.

[Repealed, § 21 ch 126 SLA 1977.]

In a court or administrative proceeding where the support of a minor child is at issue, the court or agency, as applicable, may order either parent or both parents to pay the amount necessary for support, maintenance, nurture, and education of the child. Regardless of whether a support order for periodic payments is issued, the court or agency shall issue a medical support order, a cash medical support order, or both. The medical support order shall require health care insurance coverage for the child if health care insurance coverage is available to either parent or both parents for the child at a reasonable cost. The court or agency shall consider whether the child is eligible for services through the Indian Health Service or other insurance coverage before ordering either parent or both parents to provide health care coverage through insurance, cash medical support, or other means or a combination of insurance, cash medical support, or other means. The court or agency shall allocate equally the cost of health care insurance for the child between the parents unless there is good cause to allocate the costs unequally. If the obligor has the duty to make periodic payments for non-medical child support, the obligor’s periodic payments shall be decreased by the amount of the other parent’s portion of payments for health insurance ordered by the court or agency and actually paid by the obligor. If the obligor has a duty to make periodic payments for non-medical child support, the periodic payments shall be increased by the obligor’s portion of payments for health insurance if the other parent is ordered to and actually does obtain and pay for insurance. The court or agency shall allocate equally between the parents the cost of reasonable health care expenses not covered by private insurance unless there is good cause to allocate the costs unequally. One parent shall reimburse the other parent for the first parent’s share of the uncovered expenses paid by the parent within 30 days after receipt by the first parent of the bill for the health care, payment verification, and, if applicable, a health insurance statement indicating what portion of the cost is uncovered. The medical support order must meet the requirements of AS

25.27.063

. Upon a showing of good cause, the court may order the parents required to pay support to give reasonable security for payments.

An order for prospective child support may be modified or revoked under AS

25.24.170

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 251 SLA 1976; am § 21 ch 126 SLA 1977; am § 8 ch 40 SLA 1985; am § 6 ch 68 SLA 1988; am § 10 ch 117 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 7 FSSLA 1994; am § 5 ch 102 SLA 1994; am § 7 ch 106 SLA 2000; am § 4 ch 45 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.060. Renumbered in 1990.

Cross references. —

For effect of the 2009 amendment of (c) of this section on Rule 90.3, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, by changing the standards for issuance of medical and other support orders by the court, see § 13, ch. 45, SLA 2009, in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For calculation of child support awards in administrative establishment or review proceedings, see 15 AAC 125, art. 1.

For review and adjustment of support obligations, see 15 AAC 125, art. 4.

For administrative enforcement — income withholding, see 15 AAC 125, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, in (c), in the second sentence, added “, a cash medical support order or both” at the end; in the fourth sentence, substituted “, cash medical support, or other means or a combination of insurance, cash medical support,” for “or other means” at the end; made the reference to “either parent or both parents” uniform throughout the section.

Sec. 25.27.061.
Payment of support to 18-year-olds.

A judgment, court order, or order of the agency under this chapter that provides for child support to be paid for the care of an unmarried 18-year-old child who is actively pursuing a high school diploma or an equivalent level of technical or vocational training while living as a dependent with a parent, guardian, or designee of the parent or guardian, may provide for the support to be paid directly to the child upon terms and conditions considered appropriate by the court or agency.

History.

(§ 11 ch 117 SLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For review and adjustment of support obligations, see 15 AAC 125, art. 4.

Sec. 25.27.062.
Income withholding order for support.

Unless the court or agency is establishing only a medical support order, a judgment, court order, or order of the agency under this chapter providing for support must contain an income withholding order. Except as provided in (m) of this section, the income withholding order must provide for immediate income withholding if the support order is

being enforced by the agency and was issued or modified on or after July 8, 1994; or

not being enforced by the agency and was issued on or after July 8, 1994.

An income withholding order must direct the obligor, the obligor’s employer, future employer, and any person, political subdivision, or department of the state to withhold money due or to be due the obligor and pay the money to the agency, in an amount determined under (i) of this section. A court that issues a support order on or after July 8, 1994 shall send a copy of the order to the agency.

Income withholding under a support order that does not require immediate withholding may be initiated under AS

25.27.150

if the support order is being enforced by the agency, or under (d) of this section if the support order is not being enforced by the agency, if

the obligor requests withholding;

the payments that the obligor has failed to make within 30 days of the monthly due date specified in the support order are equal to or greater than the support payable for one month; or

the obligee requests withholding and

the agency approves the request because all or part of the monthly payment of the obligor has been more than 10 days overdue more than one time in the preceding 12 months or there is reason to believe that the obligor might withdraw assets to avoid payment of support; in this paragraph, “10 days overdue” means occurring 10 days after the monthly due date specified in a support order; or

the court approves the request for good cause.

Income withholding under a support order that does not require immediate income withholding and that is not being enforced by the agency may be initiated either by filing a motion with the court and complying with applicable court rules or, if there is a child support arrearage, by making a written request to the agency for immediate income withholding under AS

25.27.150

. Application to the agency under this subsection may not, by itself, be construed as a request for other services of the agency. If immediate withholding under this subsection is sought through a motion to the court, the court shall order the beginning of income withholding under this subsection if the court finds that any of the grounds in (c)(1), (2), or (3)(B) of this section is satisfied. It is not a defense to a motion based on (c)(2) of this section that less than one full month’s payment is past due by 30 days if at least one full month’s payment was past due by 30 days on the date the motion was filed. Notice to the obligor of income withholding ordered under this subsection must be given in a manner that complies with court rules. In this subsection, “past due by 30 days” means unpaid 30 days after the monthly due date specified in the support order.

The agency or the person who obtains an income withholding order under this chapter shall immediately send a copy of the income withholding order, a copy of the relevant provisions of AS

25.27.260

and this section, and an explanation of the effect of the statutes to persons who may owe money to an obligor. These items may be served by certified mail, return receipt requested, or they may be served personally by a process server, except that the agency alternatively may send the items by electronic means. An income withholding order made under this chapter is binding upon a person, employer, political subdivision, or department of the state immediately upon receipt of a copy of the income withholding order. A person receiving an income withholding order shall immediately begin withholding the specified amount from the obligor’s earnings. The amount withheld shall be sent to the agency within seven business days after the date the amount would otherwise have been paid or credited to the obligor. An employer may, for each payment made under an order, deduct $5 from other wages or salary owed to the obligor.

An employer may not discharge, discipline, or refuse to employ an obligor on the basis of an income withholding order issued under this chapter. If an employer discharges, disciplines, or refuses to employ an obligor because of an income withholding obligation, the court, after notice and hearing, may order reinstatement or restitution to the obligor, or both. A person who violates this subsection or a regulation adopted to implement it, is liable for a civil penalty of not more than $1,000.

An income withholding order under this chapter has priority over all other attachments, executions, garnishments, or other legal process brought under state law against the same property unless otherwise ordered by the court. An income withholding order is not limited to the wages of an obligor but may include all money owed to the obligor not otherwise exempt by law. Exemptions under AS 09.38 do not apply to income withholdings under this chapter.

The court may order payment of all court costs that resulted from an income withholding proceeding under this chapter.

An employer shall, to the extent permitted under 15 U.S.C. 1673(b), withhold the current support obligation from an obligor’s wages, including the obligor’s share, if any, of the premium for health coverage required to be withheld under AS

25.27.063(c)(4)

. An employer shall withhold additional income, to the extent permitted under 15 U.S.C. 1673(b), from an obligor’s wages for any support arrearage.

An employer may combine into a single payment to the agency amounts withheld from more than one obligor if the employer specifies the portion of the payment attributable to each obligor and complies with the time deadlines set out in (e) of this section.

An employer who is withholding income of an obligor under an order that provides that the withheld income shall be paid to the agency shall notify the agency promptly when the obligor gives or receives notice of termination of employment and provide to the agency the obligor’s last known home address and the name and address of the obligor’s new employer, if known. The employer shall keep a record of the order to withhold income from the obligor for three years after the employer notifies the agency that the obligor has terminated employment. If, within that three-year period, the obligor is reemployed by the former employer, the employer shall immediately implement the order against the obligor’s earnings unless the employer has received notice from the agency that the order is no longer applicable to the obligor. If the obligor is reemployed by the former employer after that three-year period, the employer is not required to implement a withholding order against the obligor’s earnings until the employer receives a new order to withhold the obligor’s income under this chapter.

Unless modified or terminated by the agency or the court, an order to withhold income under this chapter remains in effect, except as provided in (k) of this section, until the support order is satisfied. The agency or court may not terminate or modify an income withholding order solely on the ground that the obligor has paid all arrearages. Upon satisfaction of a support order, if the order is

being enforced by the agency, the agency shall, within 15 working days, notify all persons served by the agency with the income withholding order that withholding is no longer required; if the agency receives money from an obligor under an income withholding order after the underlying support order has been satisfied and the agency was enforcing the support order at the time it became satisfied, the agency shall immediately return the overpayment to the obligor; if the agency fails to return an overpayment as required under this paragraph, the state is liable to the obligor for the amount of the overpayment, plus interest at the rate of six percent a year, and a person to whom the agency erroneously disbursed the overpayment is liable to the state for the amount disbursed, plus interest at the rate of six percent a year;

not being enforced by the agency, the obligor shall file a motion in court requesting termination of the withholding order and serve the motion on the obligee; the court shall enter an order terminating the withholding order if the court determines that the support order has been satisfied; the obligor may deliver a copy of the termination order to persons who were served with the income withholding order; when a termination order is entered, the obligee shall, upon request of the obligor, notify the obligor of all persons who have been served with the income withholding order by the obligee.

An income withholding order described in (a)(1) — (2) of this section is not subject to immediate withholding if the support order is

being enforced by the agency and the obligor agrees to keep the agency informed of the obligor’s current employer and the availability of employment-related health insurance coverage for the children covered by the support order until the support order is satisfied and

the agency has entered into its record a written agreement between the obligor and the obligee that provides for an alternative arrangement and income withholding has not been terminated previously and subsequently initiated; the agency must also be a party to an agreement under this paragraph if support has been assigned to the state; or

the obligor or obligee demonstrates and the agency, in compliance with applicable federal law, finds good cause not to require immediate income withholding because it would not be in the best interests of the child and, in a case involving the modification of a support order, the obligor has made voluntary support payments under a court or agency order and has not been in arrears in an amount equal to the support payable for one month; in this paragraph, “in arrears” means failing to make a support payment within 30 days of the monthly due date specified in the order;

not being enforced by the agency and the obligor agrees to keep the obligee informed of the obligor’s current employer and the availability of employment-related health insurance coverage for the children covered by the support order until the support order is satisfied and

the court finds that (i) a written agreement exists between the obligor and the obligee that provides for an alternative arrangement and (ii) income withholding has not been terminated previously and subsequently initiated; the agency must also be a party to an agreement under this paragraph if support has been assigned to the state; or

the obligor or obligee demonstrates, and the court, in compliance with applicable federal law, finds good cause not to require immediate income withholding because it would not be in the best interests of the child and, in a case involving the modification of a support order, the obligor has made voluntary support payments under a court or agency order and has not been in arrears in an amount equal to the support payable for one month; in this paragraph, “in arrears” means failing to make a support payment within 30 days of the monthly due date specified in the order; or

an order that involves an obligor who is receiving social security or other disability compensation that includes regular payments to the children who are the subjects of the support order, except to the extent that the payments to the children do not equal the child support due each month.

In calculating the amount of child support to be withheld under an income withholding order, the agency shall give credit to the obligor for the cost to the obligor of medical and dental insurance for the children and educational payments for the children to the extent that the insurance coverage and educational payments are required in the applicable child support order and are actually paid for by the obligor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 96 SLA 1981; am §§ 16, 17 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 118 SLA 1982; am § 39 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 144 SLA 1984; am §§ 1, 2 ch 40 SLA 1985; am §§ 2 — 5 ch 72 SLA 1986; am §§ 7, 8 ch 68 SLA 1988; am §§ 3 — 13 ch 7 FSSLA 1994; am § 6 ch 102 SLA 1994; am §§ 80 — 82 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 23 ch 132 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 2000; am § 8 ch 106 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS

09.65.132

. Renumbered as
AS 47.23.062 in 1985. Renumbered again in 1990.

Cross references. —

For immunity for certain actions relating to child support, see AS

09.65.250

.

Administrative Code. —

For administrative enforcement — income withholding, see 15 AAC 125, art. 6.

Legislative history reports. —

For letter of intent adopted by legislature in connection with the 1994 amendments to this section by
ch. 7, FSSLA 1994 (HCS CSSB 190(STA)), see 1994 Senate Journal 3463.

Sec. 25.27.063.
Medical support order.

[Repealed, § 23 ch 106 SLA 2000.]

If a parent who is required to provide health care coverage under a medical support order is eligible for family health coverage through an employer, the court or agency issuing the medical support order shall send a copy of the medical support order to the employer. If the agency has notice that the parent has changed or will be changing employment and is or will be eligible for family health coverage through the new employer, the agency shall send a copy of the medical support order to the new employer.

An employer who receives a copy of a medical support order under (b) of this section

shall allow the employee named in the order to enroll the child under the family coverage without regard to restrictions relating to enrollment periods if the child is otherwise eligible and is not already enrolled under the family coverage;

shall, if the employee fails to apply for enrollment of a child under (1) of this subsection, enroll the child under the employee’s family coverage upon application by the child’s other parent or custodian, the child support services agency, or the Department of Health and Social Services;

may not disenroll or eliminate coverage of the child while the employee is still employed by the employer unless the employer has eliminated family health coverage for all of its employees or has received written evidence that

the employee is no longer required by court order or administrative order to provide the child’s insurance coverage; or

the child is or will be enrolled in comparable health coverage through another insurer that will take effect not later than the effective date of the disenrollment or elimination of coverage; and

shall withhold from the employee’s compensation the employee’s share, if any, of premiums for health coverage to the extent permitted under 15 U.S.C. 1673(b) (Consumer Credit Protection Act) and pay the withheld amount to the appropriate insurer; if federal regulations allow the employer to withhold less than the employee’s share of the insurance premium, the employer may withhold the lesser amount and pay it to the appropriate insurer.

History.

(§ 7 ch 102 SLA 1994; am § 24 ch 132 SLA 1998; am §§ 9, 23 ch 106 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in (c) of this section in accordance with § 12(a),
ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For legislative purposes in enacting this section, see § 1, ch. 102, SLA 1994 in the Temporary and Special Acts; for purpose and findings provisions related to the 1998 amendments affecting this section, see § 1, ch. 132, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts; for effect of ch. 106, SLA 2000 (relating to medical support orders) on Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 90.3, see secs. 24 and 25, ch. 106, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For administrative enforcement — income withholding, see 15 AAC 125, art. 6.

Sec. 25.27.065.
Waiver of child support.

A custodian of a child, including a custodial parent, owes a duty to that child to ensure that child support is paid by a noncustodial parent who is obligated to pay it. An agreement to waive past or future child support, made between an obligor and a person who is entitled to receive support on behalf of an obligee, is not enforceable unless

the agreement is put in writing at the time the agreement is made; and

the agreement is signed at the time it is made by both the obligor and the person acting for the obligee.

When the right to receive child support has been assigned to a governmental entity, an agreement under (a) of this section that has not been adopted as an administrative order of the agency is not effective during a period when the obligee is receiving assistance under AS 47.27.

In a separation, dissolution, or divorce proceeding, a court may not accept a waiver of support by a custodial parent without proof that the custodial parent can support the needs of the child adequately.

History.

(§ 6 ch 144 SLA 1984; am § 8 ch 102 SLA 1994; am § 14 ch 107 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.065. Renumbered in 1990.

Sec. 25.27.070.
Order to assign wages for support.

In a proceeding in which the court has ordered either or both parents to pay for the support of a child, the court may, on its own motion or motion of a party or the agency on behalf of a party, after notice and an opportunity for hearing, order either parent or both parents to assign to the custodian of the child that portion of salary or wages of either parent due them currently and in the future sufficient to pay the amount ordered by the court for the support, maintenance, nurture, and education of the child.

The order of assignment is binding upon an employer upon service of a copy of the order upon the employer and until further order of the court. The employer may, for each payment made under the order, deduct $1 from other wages or salary owed to the employee.

The assignment made under court order has priority as against an attachment, execution, or other assignment unless otherwise ordered by the court.

An employer may not terminate an employee’s employment because wages of the employee are subject to an order under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 251 SLA 1976; am § 22 ch 126 SLA 1977; am § 12 ch 117 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.070. Renumbered in 1990.

Cross references. —

For immunity for certain actions relating to child support, see AS

09.65.250

.